Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB276.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.092 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Category I and Category II square feet" means square footage that falls under
space categories as defined by the Postsecondary Education Facilities
Inventory and Classification Manual published by the United States
Department of Education;
(b) "Comprehensive university" has the same meaning as in KRS 164.001;
(c) "Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education;
(d) "Equilibrium" means a condition in which every institution has an
appropriately proportionate level of resources as determined by the
performance funding model established in this section given each institution's
level of productivity in achieving student success outcomes, course
completion outcomes, and other components included in the model;
(e) "Formula base amount" means an institution's enacted general fund
appropriation amount minus debt service on bonds and appropriations for
mandated programs;
(f) "Hold-harmless provision" means a provision included in the funding
formulas as described in subsection (9) of this section that prevents a
reduction of a designated portion of funding for an institution through
operation of the funding formula;
(g) "Institution" means a college in the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System or a public university;
(h) "KCTCS" means the Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(i) "KCTCS institution allocable resources" means the formula base amount net
of any equity adjustment as described in subsection (7)(b) of this section, any
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 2/4/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1208
amount protected by a hold-harmless provision, and any applicable increase
or decrease in general fund appropriations;
(j) "Mandated program" means a research or public service activity that is not
integral to the instructional mission of the institution and is identified by the
General Assembly in the biennial budget;
(k) "Nontraditional age students" means students between the ages of twenty-five
(25) and sixty-four (64);
(l) "Performance fund" means the postsecondary education performance fund
established in subsection (13) of this section;
(m) "Research universities" means the University of Kentucky and the University
of Louisville;
(n) "Stop-loss provision" means a provision included in the funding formulas as
described in subsection (9) of this section to limit reduction of an institution's
funding amount to a predetermined percentage, notwithstanding the amounts
calculated by operation of the formula; and
(o) "University allocable resources" means the formula base amount net of any
small school adjustment as described in subsection (5)(c) of this section, any
amount protected by a hold-harmless provision, and any applicable increase
or decrease in general fund appropriations.
(2) The General Assembly hereby finds that improving opportunity for the
Commonwealth's citizens and building a stronger economy can be achieved by its
public college and university system focusing its efforts and resources on the goals
of:
(a) Increasing the retention and progression of students toward timely credential
or degree completion;
(b) Increasing the number and types of credentials and degrees earned by all types
of students;
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 2/4/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1208
(c) Increasing the number of credentials and degrees that garner higher salaries
upon graduation, such as science, technology, engineering, math, and health,
and in areas of industry demand;
(d) Closing achievement gaps by increasing the number of credentials and
degrees earned by low-income students, underprepared students,
underrepresented students, and nontraditional age students; and
(e) Facilitating credit hour accumulation and transfer of students from KCTCS to
four (4) year postsecondary institutions.
(3) (a) The General Assembly hereby declares these goals can best be accomplished
by implementing a comprehensive funding model for the allocation of state
general fund appropriations for postsecondary institution operations that
aligns the Commonwealth's investments in postsecondary education with the
Commonwealth's postsecondary education policy goals and objectives.
(b) The General Assembly further recognizes that priority for state general fund
appropriations for postsecondary institutions should be given to each
institution's funding floor over appropriations to the performance fund. For
purposes of this section, "funding floor" means an institution's fiscal year
2020-2021 general fund appropriation included in 2020 Ky. Acts ch. 92, plus
any fiscal year 2020-2021 distribution from the performance fund, and minus
fiscal year 2020-2021 debt service on bonds and appropriations for mandated
programs.
(4) This section establishes a comprehensive funding model for the public
postsecondary education system to be implemented by the Council on
Postsecondary Education. The funding model shall include a public university
sector formula and a KCTCS sector formula, and shall not include any race-based
metrics or targets in the formulas.
(5) The funding formula for the public university sector shall:
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 2/4/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1208
(a) Recognize differences in missions and cost structures between research
universities and comprehensive universities to ensure that neither are
advantaged or disadvantaged during the first full year of implementation;
(b) Distribute one hundred percent (100%) of the university allocable resources
for all universities in the sector, based on rational criteria, including student
success, course completion, and operational support components, regardless
of whether state funding for postsecondary institution operations increases,
decreases, or remains stable;
(c) Include an adjustment to minimize impact on smaller campuses as determined
by the council; and
(d) Be constructed to achieve equilibrium, at which point the funding formula
rewards rates of improvement above the sector average rate.
(6) Funding for the public university sector shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Forty percent (40%) of total university allocable resources shall be distributed
based on each university's share of total student success outcomes produced,
including but not limited to:
1. Bachelor's degree production;
2. Numbers of students progressing beyond thirty (30), sixty (60), and
ninety (90) credit hour thresholds;
3. Science, technology, engineering, math, and health bachelor's degree
production; and
4. Bachelor's degrees earned by low-income students and underrepresented
students;
(b) Thirty percent (30%) of total university allocable resources shall be
distributed based on each university's share of sector total student credit hours
earned, excluding dual credit enrollment, weighted to account for cost
differences by academic discipline and course level, such as lower and upper
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 2/4/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1208
division baccalaureate, master's, doctoral research, doctoral professional, and
nontraditional age students; and
(c) Thirty percent (30%) of total university allocable resources shall be
distributed in support of vital campus operations as follows:
1. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each university's share
of Category I and Category II square feet, net of research, nonclass
laboratory, and open laboratory space, to support maintenance and
operation of campus facilities and may include a space utilization factor
as determined by the council in collaboration with the working group
established in subsection (11) of this section;
2. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each university's share
of total instruction and student services spending, net of maintenance
and operation, to support campus administrative functions; and
3. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each university's share
of total full-time equivalent student enrollment to support academic
support services such as libraries and academic computing.
(7) The funding formula for the KCTCS sector:
(a) Shall distribute one hundred percent (100%) of KCTCS institution allocable
resources for all KCTCS colleges based on rational criteria, including student
success, course completion, and operational support components, regardless
of whether state funding for postsecondary institution operations increases,
decreases, or remains stable;
(b) May include an adjustment to account for community economic disadvantage
in some regions of the Commonwealth as determined by the council; and
(c) Shall be constructed to achieve equilibrium, at which point the funding
formula rewards rates of improvement above the sector average rate.
(8) Funding for the KCTCS sector shall be distributed as follows:
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 2/4/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1208
(a) Thirty-five percent (35%) of total KCTCS institution allocable resources shall
be distributed based on each college's share of total student success outcomes
produced, including but not limited to:
1. Certificate, diploma, and associate degree production, weighted to
provide a premium for credentials that are aligned with the economic
needs of the state;
2. Numbers of students progressing beyond fifteen (15), thirty (30), and
forty-five (45) credit hour thresholds;
3. Credentials earned by low-income students, underprepared students,
underrepresented students, and nontraditional age students; and
4. Transfers to four (4) year institutions;
(b) Thirty-five percent (35%) of total KCTCS institution allocable resources shall
be distributed based on each college's share of total student credit hours
earned, weighted to account for cost differences by academic discipline; and
(c) Thirty percent (30%) of total KCTCS institution allocable resources shall be
distributed in support of vital campus operations as follows:
1. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each college's share of
Category I and Category II square feet, net of research, nonclass
laboratory, and open laboratory space, to support maintenance and
operation of campus facilities and may include a space utilization factor
as determined by the council in collaboration with the postsecondary
education working group established in subsection (11) of this section;
2. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each college's share of
total instruction and student services spending, net of maintenance and
operation, to support campus administrative functions; and
3. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each college's share of
total full-time equivalent student enrollment to support academic
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 2/4/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1208
support services such as libraries and academic computing.
(9) (a) The funding formula for both sectors shall include:
1. A hold-harmless provision for fiscal year 2018-2019 preventing a
reduction in an institution's funding amount based solely on the formula
calculation, and allowing a hold-harmless amount determined by the
formula in fiscal year 2018-2019 to be deducted from an institution's
formula base amount in whole or in part in fiscal years 2019-2020 and
2020-2021, as determined by the council;
2. A hold-harmless provision for fiscal year 2021-2022, and every fiscal
year thereafter, preventing a reduction in an institution's funding amount
based solely on the formula calculation;
3. A stop-loss provision for fiscal year 2019-2020 limiting the reduction in
funding to any institution to one percent (1%) of that institution's
formula base amount;
4. A stop-loss provision for fiscal year 2020-2021 limiting the reduction in
funding to any institution to two percent (2%) of that institution's
formula base amount; and
5. A stop-loss provision for fiscal year 2021-2022, and every fiscal year
thereafter, limiting the reduction in funding to any institution to zero
percent (0%) of that institution's formula base amount.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be construed to limit the level of a
budget reduction that may be enacted by the General Assembly or
implemented by the Governor.
(10) (a) By May 1 each year, the council shall certify to the Office of the State Budget
Director the amount to be distributed to each of the public universities and
KCTCS as determined by the comprehensive funding model created in this
section, not to exceed the available balance in the performance fund.
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 2/4/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1208
(b) The Office of the State Budget Director shall distribute the appropriations in
the performance fund for that fiscal year to the institutions in the amounts the
council has certified. The adjusted appropriations to each institution shall be
allotted as provided in KRS 48.600, 48.605, 48.610, 48.620, and 48.630.
(c) 1. The certified amounts distributed from the performance fund to the
institutions are nonrecurring funds that shall not be included in the
institutions' base budget amounts submitted in their biennial budget
requests.
2. The certified amounts distributed from the performance fund in the
previous fiscal year shall be included in the performance fund's base
budget amount submitted by the council in the biennial budget request.
(d) For fiscal year 2017-2018, the Office of the State Budget Director shall
distribute to the public postsecondary education institutions, except for
Kentucky State University, those funds appropriated to the performance fund
by the General Assembly in 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 149, Part I, K., 12., in
accordance with the comprehensive funding model created in this section.
(11) (a) The Council on Postsecondary Education is hereby directed to establish a
postsecondary education working group composed of the following members:
1. The president of the council who shall serve as chairperson of the
group and shall be a nonvoting member;
2. The president or designee of one (1)[each] public postsecondary
research institution to be chosen by the presidents of all public
postsecondary research institutions[, including the president of
KCTCS];
3. The president or designee of one (1) public postsecondary
comprehensive institution to be chosen by the presidents of all public
postsecondary comprehensive institutions;
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 2/4/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1208
4. The president or designee of the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System;
5. Three (3) members of the Senate appointed by the President of the
Senate;
6. Three (3) members of the House of Representatives appointed by the
Speaker of the House;
7. Three (3) members appointed by the Governor, who:
a. Have expertise in postsecondary education;
b. Are not employed by any public postsecondary institution; and
c. Do not serve on the board of any public postsecondary
institution; and
8. The state budget director or his or her designee[The Governor or
designee;
4. The Speaker of the House or designee; and
5. The President of the Senate or designee].
(b) Beginning in calendar[fiscal] year 2025[2020-2021] and each odd-numbered
year[every three (3) fiscal years] thereafter, the postsecondary education
working group shall convene to determine if the comprehensive funding
model is functioning as expected, identify any unintended consequences of
the model, and recommend any adjustments to the model. The council may
call the working group to convene prior to the start of the odd-
numbered[required fiscal] year to allow sufficient time for the group to
complete its work.
(c) The results of the review and recommendations of the working group shall be
reported by the council to the Governor, the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue, and the Interim Joint Committee on Education
by December 1 of each[ fiscal] year the working group convenes.
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 2/4/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1208
(12) The council shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to
implement the provisions of this section.
(13) (a) The postsecondary education performance fund is hereby established as an
appropriation unit to support improvement in the operations of the public
postsecondary institutions and achievement of the Commonwealth's education
policy goals and workforce development priorities. General fund moneys may
be appropriated by the General Assembly to this fund for distribution to the
public postsecondary institutions in amounts determined through the
comprehensive funding model created in this section.
(b) Any balance in the performance fund at the close of any fiscal year shall not
lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and be continuously
appropriated for the purposes specified in this section. A general statement
that all continuing appropriations are repealed, discontinued, or suspended
shall not operate to repeal, discontinue, or suspend this fund or to repeal this
action.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 2/4/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed